NodeJsProjects/SpellChecker/Dictionaries/tr_TR/tr_TR.aff
FLAG num
SFX 12296 N 1
SFX 12296 0 abileceğimizi .
SFX 12297 N 1
SFX 12297 0 lanmadır .
SFX 12298 N 1
SFX 12298 0 landırabilecekleri .
SFX 12299 N 1
SFX 12299 0 liyken .
SFX 12300 N 1
SFX 12300 0 nilmesini .
SFX 12301 N 1
SFX 12301 0 laşmamışlardı .
SFX 12302 N 1
SFX 12302 0 lanmadık .
SFX 12303 N 1
SFX 12303 0 lanmadım .
SFX 12304 N 1
SFX 12304 0 tırken .
SFX 12305 N 1
SFX 12305 0 nilmesine .
SFX 12306 N 1
SFX 12306 0 tüğümüz .
SFX 12307 N 1
SFX 12307 0 müşsünüz .
SFX 12308 N 1
SFX 12308 0 nıyorsanız .
SFX 12309 N 1
SFX 12309 0 deki .
SFX 12310 N 1
SFX 12310 0 landırmadı .
SFX 12311 N 1
SFX 12311 0 lanmalardan .
SFX 12312 N 1
SFX 12312 0 tırılmadığından .
SFX 12313 N 1
SFX 12313 0 leyebilirdi .
SFX 12314 N 1
SFX 12314 0 leyebilme .
SFX 12315 N 1
SFX 12315 0 liğinizde .
SFX 12316 N 1
SFX 12316 0 liyorsak .
SFX 12317 N 1
SFX 12317 0 ılıları .
SFX 12318 N 1
SFX 12318 0 tiğinde .
SFX 12319 N 1
SFX 12319 0 lanalı .
SFX 12320 N 1
SFX 12320 0 tüldüğüne .
SFX 12321 N 1
SFX 12321 0 duruyor .
SFX 12322 N 1
SFX 12322 0 lukları .
SFX 12323 N 1
SFX 12323 0 nmamış .
SFX 12324 N 1
SFX 12324 0 ülmelerinde .
SFX 12325 N 1
SFX 12325 0 madıklarıdır .
SFX 12326 N 1
SFX 12326 0 lemişlerdir .
SFX 12327 N 1
SFX 12327 0 leniyordur .
SFX 12328 N 1
SFX 12328 0 leniyordum .
SFX 12329 N 1
SFX 12329 0 emiyorlardı .
SFX 12330 N 1
SFX 12330 0 leniyorduk .
SFX 12331 N 1
SFX 12331 0 ndırıldı .
SFX 12332 N 1
SFX 12332 0 ttıracaklarını .
SFX 12333 N 1
SFX 12333 0 tılmışlardı .
SFX 12334 N 1
SFX 12334 0 ttiniz .
SFX 12335 N 1
SFX 12335 0 leşebildiklerini .
SFX 12336 N 1
SFX 12336 0 lenebileceğinin .
SFX 12337 N 1
SFX 12337 0 tiğince .
SFX 12338 N 1
SFX 12338 0 laşmadır .
SFX 12339 N 1
SFX 12339 0 landırmama .
SFX 12340 N 1
SFX 12340 0 laşmadım .
SFX 12341 N 1
SFX 12341 0 laşmadık .
SFX 12342 N 1
SFX 12342 0 üleceklerdir .
SFX 12343 N 1
SFX 12343 0 ilememe .
SFX 12344 N 1
SFX 12344 0 tiremedikleri .
SFX 12345 N 1
SFX 12345 0 sallaştığına .
SFX 12346 N 1
SFX 12346 0 dirilebildiğini .
SFX 12347 N 1
SFX 12347 0 çularına .
SFX 12348 N 1
SFX 12348 0 ılamayabilir .
SFX 12349 N 1
SFX 12349 0 uyorsak .
SFX 12350 N 1
SFX 12350 0 dürmeleri .
SFX 12351 N 1
SFX 12351 0 leyebiliriz .
SFX 12352 N 1
SFX 12352 0 madığıyla .
SFX 12353 N 1
SFX 12353 0 amayalım .
SFX 12354 N 1
SFX 12354 0 tıracaktır .
SFX 12355 N 1
SFX 12355 0 lananı .
SFX 12356 N 1
SFX 12356 0 ulduklarından .
SFX 12357 N 1
SFX 12357 0 latılmaz .
SFX 12358 N 1
SFX 12358 0 lamaca .
SFX 12359 N 1
SFX 12359 0 lendirmesine .
SFX 12360 N 1
SFX 12360 0 cilerimizi .
SFX 12361 N 1
SFX 12361 0 tmemenin .
SFX 12362 N 1
SFX 12362 0 uyorsam .
SFX 12363 N 1
SFX 12363 0 nmalarındaki .
SFX 12364 N 1
SFX 12364 0 uyorsan .
SFX 12365 N 1
SFX 12365 0 yin .
SFX 12366 N 1
SFX 12366 0 üşümde .
SFX 12367 N 1
SFX 12367 0 lıklarımdan .
SFX 12368 N 1
SFX 12368 0 ilmezken .
SFX 12369 N 1
SFX 12369 0 yim .
SFX 12370 N 1
SFX 12370 0 dıktan .
SFX 12371 N 1
SFX 12371 0 leyebilirim .
SFX 12372 N 1
SFX 12372 0 ıştırmalarına .
SFX 12373 N 1
SFX 12373 0 ulabilir .
SFX 12374 N 1
SFX 12374 0 ydü .
SFX 12375 N 1
SFX 12375 0 laştırdığına .
SFX 12376 N 1
SFX 12376 0 ladığı .
SFX 12377 N 1
SFX 12377 0 üldüğünü .
SFX 12378 N 1
SFX 12378 0 eyken .
SFX 12379 N 1
SFX 12379 0 letmesinin .
SFX 12380 N 1
SFX 12380 0 tmasın .
SFX 12381 N 1
SFX 12381 0 iyorlardı .
SFX 12382 N 1
SFX 12382 0 enlerinde .
SFX 12383 N 1
SFX 12383 0 yiz .
SFX 12384 N 1
SFX 12384 0 malıdır .
SFX 12385 N 1
SFX 12385 0 malısı .
SFX 12386 N 1
SFX 12386 0 madığıydı .
SFX 12387 N 1
SFX 12387 0 luklarından .
SFX 12388 N 1
SFX 12388 0 yip .
SFX 12389 N 1
SFX 12389 0 dırılırken .
SFX 12391 N 1
SFX 12391 0 larındayız .
SFX 12390 N 1
SFX 12390 0 üldüğü .
SFX 12392 N 1
SFX 12392 0 cısın .
SFX 12394 N 1
SFX 12394 0 cilerimize .
SFX 12393 N 1
SFX 12393 0 üştüğünü .
SFX 12395 N 1
SFX 12395 0 landırılmadı .
SFX 12396 N 1
SFX 12396 0 latılmak .
SFX 12397 N 1
SFX 12397 0 leşmeyenler .
SFX 12398 N 1
SFX 12398 0 dıracaktır .
SFX 12400 N 1
SFX 12400 0 cısız .
SFX 12399 N 1
SFX 12399 0 leştirmeliydi .
SFX 12402 N 1
SFX 12402 0 lemekle .
SFX 12401 N 1
SFX 12401 0 dirilişinde .
SFX 12403 N 1
SFX 12403 0 leştirilmiyor .
SFX 12404 N 1
SFX 12404 0 mazken .
SFX 12406 N 1
SFX 12406 0 ndireceği .
SFX 12405 N 1
SFX 12405 0 ıntıdan .
SFX 12408 N 1
SFX 12408 0 yemiyorlar .
SFX 12407 N 1
SFX 12407 0 ladıysak .
SFX 12410 N 1
SFX 12410 0 tenler .
SFX 12409 N 1
SFX 12409 0 layabildikleri .
SFX 12411 N 1
SFX 12411 0 ndıklarına .
SFX 12413 N 1
SFX 12413 0 lanana .
SFX 12412 N 1
SFX 12412 0 ilmiyordu .
SFX 12414 N 1
SFX 12414 0 cılarda .
SFX 12415 N 1
SFX 12415 0 tamamalarının .
SFX 12416 N 1
SFX 12416 0 liğinizin .
SFX 12417 N 1
SFX 12417 0 ndırılma .
SFX 12418 N 1
SFX 12418 0 şirken .
SFX 12419 N 1
SFX 12419 0 laşmamıştı .
SFX 12420 N 1
SFX 12420 0 lenmediği .
SFX 12421 N 1
SFX 12421 0 üyorsan .
SFX 12422 N 1
SFX 12422 0 diriyorlar .
SFX 12423 N 1
SFX 12423 0 ilmezler .
SFX 12424 N 1
SFX 12424 0 leyebilmektedir .
SFX 12425 N 1
SFX 12425 0 layabilirim .
SFX 12428 N 1
SFX 12428 0 rken .
SFX 12427 N 1
SFX 12427 0 ılamamaları .
SFX 12426 N 1
SFX 12426 0 endeki .
SFX 12429 N 1
SFX 12429 0 lıları .
SFX 12430 N 1
SFX 12430 0 cılarca .
SFX 12432 N 1
SFX 12432 0 tılacak .
SFX 12431 N 1
SFX 12431 0 lamayanlar .
SFX 12433 N 1
SFX 12433 0 meler .
SFX 12434 N 1
SFX 12434 0 tıldıklarında .
SFX 12435 N 1
SFX 12435 0 leştirdikçe .
SFX 12436 N 1
SFX 12436 0 tirirken .
SFX 12437 N 1
SFX 12437 0 emeyecekler .
SFX 12438 N 1
SFX 12438 0 melik .
SFX 12439 N 1
SFX 12439 0 leyebilir .
SFX 12440 N 1
SFX 12440 0 'lar .
SFX 12441 N 1
SFX 12441 0 ememelerine .
SFX 12442 N 1
SFX 12442 0 yemeyeceğimiz .
SFX 12443 N 1
SFX 12443 0 şılmazdı .
SFX 12446 N 1
SFX 12446 0 lenmelerinden .
SFX 12445 N 1
SFX 12445 0 lanmalıdırlar .
SFX 12444 N 1
SFX 12444 0 ilebileceğim .
SFX 12447 N 1
SFX 12447 0 lendiremeyeceğini .
SFX 12450 N 1
SFX 12450 0 ştireceğine .
SFX 12449 N 1
SFX 12449 0 ılabilecekti .
SFX 12448 N 1
SFX 12448 0 lanabilmelerinin .
SFX 12454 N 1
SFX 12454 0 layabiliriz .
SFX 12453 N 1
SFX 12453 0 üyorsam .
SFX 12452 N 1
SFX 12452 0 nmedim .
SFX 12451 N 1
SFX 12451 0 ştırmaların .
SFX 12455 N 1
SFX 12455 0 dıkları .
SFX 12458 N 1
SFX 12458 0 nmedik .
SFX 12457 N 1
SFX 12457 0 üyorsak .
SFX 12456 N 1
SFX 12456 0 lendiremeyeceğine .
SFX 12460 N 1
SFX 12460 0 ştireceğini .
SFX 12459 N 1
SFX 12459 0 nmedir .
SFX 12462 N 1
SFX 12462 0 düğüne .
SFX 12461 N 1
SFX 12461 0 emiyorsanız .
SFX 12463 N 1
SFX 12463 0 irsiniz .
SFX 12464 N 1
SFX 12464 0 şamayacaklarının .
SFX 12465 N 1
SFX 12465 0 indedirler .
SFX 12467 N 1
SFX 12467 0 leştirmeliyiz .
SFX 12466 N 1
SFX 12466 0 ludurlar .
SFX 12468 N 1
SFX 12468 0 ştıramıyoruz .
SFX 12470 N 1
SFX 12470 0 tmeliydi .
SFX 12469 N 1
SFX 12469 0 tıramayınca .
SFX 12471 N 1
SFX 12471 0 sindenim .
SFX 12472 N 1
SFX 12472 0 tmayacaklardır .
SFX 12474 N 1
SFX 12474 0 siyseniz .
SFX 12473 N 1
SFX 12473 0 ındaymışlar .
SFX 12475 N 1
SFX 12475 0 liklerinden .
SFX 12476 N 1
SFX 12476 0 laştırılabileceğine .
SFX 12477 N 1
SFX 12477 0 laştırılmasına .
SFX 12478 N 1
SFX 12478 0 tıracaklardır .
SFX 12479 N 1
SFX 12479 0 ışmışlardı .
SFX 12481 N 1
SFX 12481 0 tmayan .
SFX 12480 N 1
SFX 12480 0 layabilirdi .
SFX 12482 N 1
SFX 12482 0 cusundan .
SFX 12484 N 1
SFX 12484 0 ılmayacağım .
SFX 12483 N 1
SFX 12483 0 madıysan .
SFX 12485 N 1
SFX 12485 0 amayabilirsiniz .
SFX 12487 N 1
SFX 12487 0 luları .
SFX 12486 N 1
SFX 12486 0 madıysam .
SFX 12488 N 1
SFX 12488 0 ulabildi .
SFX 12490 N 1
SFX 12490 0 laştırılabileceğini .
SFX 12489 N 1
SFX 12489 0 madıysak .
SFX 12492 N 1
SFX 12492 0 ılmayacak .
SFX 12491 N 1
SFX 12491 0 tildikleri .
SFX 12494 N 1
SFX 12494 0 celerinin .
SFX 12493 N 1
SFX 12493 0 sallaştırmış .
SFX 12495 N 1
SFX 12495 0 ılmayacağız .
SFX 12497 N 1
SFX 12497 0 leştirilerek .
SFX 12496 N 1
SFX 12496 0 tmayanları .
SFX 12498 N 1
SFX 12498 0 nımlarını .
SFX 12499 N 1
SFX 12499 0 lerindekilerden .
SFX 12500 N 1
SFX 12500 0 ülmelidir .
SFX 12501 N 1
SFX 12501 0 ileni .
SFX 12502 N 1
SFX 12502 0 mışlığından .
SFX 12503 N 1
SFX 12503 0 layışında .
SFX 12504 N 1
SFX 12504 0 leştiremeyeceğine .
SFX 12506 N 1
SFX 12506 0 laştırılmasını .
SFX 12505 N 1
SFX 12505 0 ilene .
SFX 12507 N 1
SFX 12507 0 iklere .
SFX 12508 N 1
SFX 12508 0 leştiremeyeceğini .
SFX 12509 N 1
SFX 12509 0 leyebildi .
SFX 12510 N 1
SFX 12510 0 ilmezliğinin .
SFX 12511 N 1
SFX 12511 0 nıyorlarmış .
SFX 12513 N 1
SFX 12513 0 ikleri .
SFX 12512 N 1
SFX 12512 0 ünemeyeceğini .
SFX 12514 N 1
SFX 12514 0 ılmayacağının .
SFX 12515 N 1
SFX 12515 0 uşmalarının .
SFX 12516 N 1
SFX 12516 0 lense .
SFX 12518 N 1
SFX 12518 0 yıcıları .
SFX 12517 N 1
SFX 12517 0 liğinizle .
SFX 12519 N 1
SFX 12519 0 ememelerini .
SFX 12520 N 1
SFX 12520 0 leyebilen .
SFX 12522 N 1
SFX 12522 0 abildiğine .
SFX 12521 N 1
SFX 12521 0 layanlara .
SFX 12524 N 1
SFX 12524 0 mamasını .
SFX 12523 N 1
SFX 12523 0 ileme .
SFX 12525 N 1
SFX 12525 0 selliğiyle .
SFX 12527 N 1
SFX 12527 0 siniz .
SFX 12526 N 1
SFX 12526 0 abildiğini .
SFX 12528 N 1
SFX 12528 0 'ler .
SFX 12529 N 1
SFX 12529 0 landırılmalı .
SFX 12530 N 1
SFX 12530 0 şmadı .
SFX 12531 N 1
SFX 12531 0 nebileceği .
SFX 12532 N 1
SFX 12532 0 ulası .
SFX 12533 N 1
SFX 12533 0 leşene .
SFX 12534 N 1
SFX 12534 0 lemeler .
SFX 12535 N 1
SFX 12535 0 meyesiniz .
SFX 12536 N 1
SFX 12536 0 ttiklerinden .
SFX 12537 N 1
SFX 12537 0 lıktı .
SFX 12538 N 1
SFX 12538 0 laştırdığını .
SFX 12542 N 1
SFX 12542 0 nememiştir .
SFX 12541 N 1
SFX 12541 0 ttirdiklerini .
SFX 12540 N 1
SFX 12540 0 'mizin .
SFX 12539 N 1
SFX 12539 0 leşeni .
SFX 12544 N 1
SFX 12544 0 şırken .
SFX 12543 N 1
SFX 12543 0 düğümü .
SFX 12546 N 1
SFX 12546 0 ındadır .
SFX 12545 N 1
SFX 12545 0 durlar .
SFX 12547 N 1
SFX 12547 0 caların .
SFX 12549 N 1
SFX 12549 0 leriydik .
SFX 12548 N 1
SFX 12548 0 ileli .
SFX 12550 N 1
SFX 12550 0 lanama .
SFX 12552 N 1
SFX 12552 0 latmıyor .
SFX 12551 N 1
SFX 12551 0 abildiğimi .
SFX 12553 N 1
SFX 12553 0 ılamamıştı .
SFX 12555 N 1
SFX 12555 0 luklara .
SFX 12554 N 1
SFX 12554 0 turanları .
SFX 12556 N 1
SFX 12556 0 tılışından .
SFX 12557 N 1
SFX 12557 0 namadıkları .
SFX 12558 N 1
SFX 12558 0 leşeyim .
SFX 12559 N 1
SFX 12559 0 lılara .
SFX 12560 N 1
SFX 12560 0 lanmakla .
SFX 12561 N 1
SFX 12561 0 düğünü .
SFX 12564 N 1
SFX 12564 0 iydiler .
SFX 12563 N 1
SFX 12563 0 ıştırmadıkları .
SFX 12562 N 1
SFX 12562 0 üşecek .
SFX 12565 N 1
SFX 12565 0 çularını .
SFX 12566 N 1
SFX 12566 0 tirildiğinden .
SFX 12568 N 1
SFX 12568 0 laştıklarının .
SFX 12567 N 1
SFX 12567 0 dıramadım .
SFX 12569 N 1
SFX 12569 0 nmeyenleri .
SFX 12570 N 1
SFX 12570 0 cılarla .
SFX 12571 N 1
SFX 12571 0 landırması .
SFX 12572 N 1
SFX 12572 0 lılığıyla .
SFX 12573 N 1
SFX 12573 0 lendirmişler .
SFX 12574 N 1
SFX 12574 0 tılmamasını .
SFX 12575 N 1
SFX 12575 0 landırmaya .
SFX 12576 N 1
SFX 12576 0 dıramadık .
SFX 12578 N 1
SFX 12578 0 leşemeyen .
SFX 12577 N 1
SFX 12577 0 dırmaması .
SFX 12579 N 1
SFX 12579 0 ilesi .
SFX 12580 N 1
SFX 12580 0 inemeyeceğine .
SFX 12581 N 1
SFX 12581 0 layamıyorsunuz .
SFX 12582 N 1
SFX 12582 0 lememişti .
SFX 12584 N 1
SFX 12584 0 lamıyorum .
SFX 12583 N 1
SFX 12583 0 lılaştığı .
SFX 12585 N 1
SFX 12585 0 ülebildiği .
SFX 12586 N 1
SFX 12586 0 ulanı .
SFX 12589 N 1
SFX 12589 0 indendir .
SFX 12588 N 1
SFX 12588 0 ulabileceğini .
SFX 12587 N 1
SFX 12587 0 ılmalıdırlar .
SFX 12591 N 1
SFX 12591 0 undaydılar .
SFX 12590 N 1
SFX 12590 0 inemeyeceğini .
SFX 12592 N 1
SFX 12592 0 eceklerden .
SFX 12593 N 1
SFX 12593 0 şmıştır .
SFX 12594 N 1
SFX 12594 0 ecektiniz .
SFX 12596 N 1
SFX 12596 0 ulabileceğine .
SFX 12595 N 1
SFX 12595 0 lanabilmektedir .
SFX 12599 N 1
SFX 12599 0 amamasından .
SFX 12598 N 1
SFX 12598 0 lendirilmişlerdi .
SFX 12597 N 1
SFX 12597 0 şmıştık .
SFX 12600 N 1
SFX 12600 0 tilemediğinin .
SFX 12601 N 1
SFX 12601 0 nişini .
SFX 12604 N 1
SFX 12604 0 'dayız .
SFX 12603 N 1
SFX 12603 0 işmelidir .
SFX 12602 N 1
SFX 12602 0 iştirildiği .
SFX 12605 N 1
SFX 12605 0 ttıklarında .
SFX 12606 N 1
SFX 12606 0 luktadır .
SFX 12607 N 1
SFX 12607 0 'lik .
SFX 12608 N 1
SFX 12608 0 mandaki .
